Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska29-4402
House arrest; prohibited.

When a person is found guilty of a crime involving abuse as defined in section 42-903, a court shall not order house arrest for the person in the residence of the victim, regardless of the ownership of the residence.

Laws 2004, LB 613, § 10.